Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB568.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5069YC (1) 91 ss/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 144C.8, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 144C.8 Forfeiture of authority to control. 3 A designee or person with the authority to control under 4 this chapter shall forfeit all rights and authority under a 5 declaration, or by operation of section 144C.5 , and all rights 6 and authority under the declaration, or by operation of section 7 144C.5 , shall vest in and devolve upon an alternate designee, 8 or if there is none, vest in and devolve pursuant to section 9 144C.5 , under either any of the following circumstances: 10 1. The designee or person with the authority to control 11 under this chapter is charged with murder in the first or 12 second degree or voluntary manslaughter in connection with the 13 declarantâs decedentâs death and those charges are known to a 14 third party. 15 2. The designee or person with the authority to control 16 under this chapter does not exercise the designeeâs authority 17 under the declaration or the personâs authority under this 18 chapter within twenty-four hours of receiving notification of 19 the death of the declarant decedent or within forty hours of 20 the declarantâs decedentâs death, whichever is earlier. 21 3. The designee or person with the authority to control 22 under this chapter does not claim the cremated remains of the 23 decedent within thirty calendar days after receipt of a written 24 notice from a third party. 25